Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.56.160

Possessing stolen property in the second degree—Other than firearm or motor vehicle.

(1) A person is guilty of possessing stolen property in the second degree if:

(a) He or she possesses stolen property, other than a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 or a motor vehicle, which exceeds seven hundred fifty dollars in value but does not exceed five thousand dollars in value; or

(b) He or she possesses a stolen public record, writing or instrument kept, filed, or deposited according to law; or

(c) He or she possesses a stolen access device.

(2) Possessing stolen property in the second degree is a class C felony.

[ 2009 c 431 s 13; 2007 c 199 s 7; 1995 c 129 s 15 (Initiative Measure No. 159); 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 434; 1987 c 140 s 4; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.56.160.]

NOTES:

Applicability—2009 c 431: See note following RCW 4.24.230.

Findings—Intent—Short title—2007 c 199: See notes following RCW 9A.56.065.

Findings and intent—Short title—Severability—Captions not law—1995 c 129: See notes following RCW 9.94A.510.

Finding—Intent—Severability—1994 sp.s. c 7: See notes following RCW 43.70.540.

Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 7 ss 401-410, 413-416, 418-437, and 439-460: See note following RCW 9.41.010.

Property crime database, liability: RCW 4.24.340.